Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF679.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2813YH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 679 Section 1. Section 331.301, subsection 6, paragraph 1 c, subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (b), unnumbered 2 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3 âContainerâ means a bag, other than a single-use plastic bag, 4 cup, package, container, bottle, or other packaging that is all 5 of the following: 6 Sec. 2. Section 331.301, subsection 6, paragraph c, 7 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended by adding the following 8 new subparagraph division: 9 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH DIVISION . (c) âSingle-use plastic bagâ 10 means a bag made of plastic that is provided by a retailer to 11 a consumer at the point of sale and that is not a reusable 12 grocery bag. A single-use plastic bag does not include any of 13 the following: 14 (i) A bag provided by a pharmacy to a customer purchasing a 15 prescription medication. 16 (ii) A bag without handles used to protect a purchased 17 item from damaging or contaminating other purchased items when 18 placed in another bag. 19 (iii) A bag provided to contain an unwrapped food item. 20 Sec. 3. Section 331.301, subsection 6, paragraph c, Code 21 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 22 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) This paragraph âcâ does not prohibit 23 a county from adopting or enforcing an ordinance, motion, 24 resolution, or amendment that sets a fee for providing a 25 single-use plastic bag with a sale or lease of consumer 26 merchandise. 27 Sec. 4. Section 364.3, subsection 3, paragraph c, 28 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (b), unnumbered 29 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 30 âContainerâ means a bag, other than a single-use plastic bag, 31 cup, package, container, bottle, or other packaging that is all 32 of the following: 33 Sec. 5. Section 364.3, subsection 3, paragraph c, 34 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended by adding the following 35 -1- LSB 2813YH (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 3 H.F. 679 new subparagraph division: 1 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH DIVISION . (c) âSingle-use plastic bagâ 2 means a bag made of plastic that is provided by a retailer to 3 a consumer at the point of sale and that is not a reusable 4 grocery bag. A single-use plastic bag does not include any of 5 the following: 6 (i) A bag provided by a pharmacy to a customer purchasing a 7 prescription medication. 8 (ii) A bag without handles used to protect a purchased 9 item from damaging or contaminating other purchased items when 10 placed in another bag. 11 (iii) A bag provided to contain an unwrapped food item. 12 Sec. 6. Section 364.3, subsection 3, paragraph c, Code 2025, 13 is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 14 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) This paragraph âcâ does not 15 prohibit a city from adopting or enforcing an ordinance, 16 motion, resolution, or amendment that sets a fee for providing 17 a single-use plastic bag with a sale or lease of consumer 18 merchandise. 19